District of Columbia statutes.
21-2102

Durable power of attorney.

A power of attorney legally sufficient under this chapter is durable to the extent that durable powers are permitted by sections 21-2081 through 21-2085 , or other law of the District of Columbia and the power of attorney contains language such as “This power of attorney will continue to be effective if I become disabled, incapacitated, or incompetent,” showing the intent of the principal that the power granted may be exercised notwithstanding later disability, incapacity, or incompetency.

History

Sept. 18, 1998, D.C. Law 12-147, § 2, 45 DCR 3853
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 143, 47 DCR 520

Cross References

Durable power of attorney generally, see § 21-2101 et seq.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 21-2102.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 13-91 validated a previously made technical amendment.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 2 of the Uniform Statutory Form Power of Attorney Act.